Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.060

Instrument establishing trust, inventory of assets, registration status, successor trustee information, and amendments to be filed.

(1) Every trustee required to file under RCW 11.110.051 shall file with the secretary of state within four months after receiving possession or control of the trust corpus, or after the trust becomes a trust described by RCW 11.110.051(1):

(a) A copy of the instrument establishing his or her title, powers, or duties;

(b) An inventory of the assets of such charitable trust; and

(c) A registration form setting forth the trustee's name, mailing address, physical address if different, and additional identifying information required by the secretary by rule.

(2) A successor trustee to a previously registered trust shall file a registration form and inventory of assets within four months after receiving possession or control of the trust corpus.

(3) A trustee required to register shall file with the secretary of state copies of all amendments to the trust instrument within four months of the making of the amendment.

[ 1997 c 124 s 2; 1993 c 471 s 28; 1985 c 30 s 117. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 150; 1971 ex.s. c 226 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 6. Formerly RCW 19.10.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.